Missouri, session 2026, HB1872.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 217.692, RSMo, is repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 217.692, 557.600, 557.602, 557.604, 557.606, and 557.608,
to read as follows:
217.692. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any offender
incarcerated in a correctional institution serving any sentence [of life with no parole for fifty
years or life without parole, whose plea of guilt was entered or whose trial commenced prior
to December 31, 1990,] and who:
(1) Pleaded guilty to or was found guilty of [a homicide of a spouse or domestic
partner] an offense stemming directly from the offender's history of abuse by a spouse,
domestic partner, intimate partner, household member, or sexual or labor trafficker
including, but not limited to, homicide of such abuser;
(2) Has no prior violent felony convictions;
(3) No longer has a cognizable legal claim or legal recourse; and
(4) Has a history of being a victim of continual and substantial physical,
psychological, or sexual domestic violence [that was not presented as an affirmative defense
at trial or sentencing] or sexual or labor trafficking within five years prior to or on the
date of the offense for which he or she was convicted and such violence or trafficking
was a contributing factor to the behavior underlying his or her criminal conviction and
such history can be corroborated with evidence of facts or circumstances which existed at the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1872 2
time of the alleged physical, psychological, or sexual domestic violence or sexual or labor
trafficking of the offender, including but not limited to witness statements, hospital records,
social services records, and law enforcement records;

shall be eligible for parole after having served [fifteen years] the lesser of five years or one-
third of such sentence when the parole board determines by using the guidelines established
by this section that there is a strong and reasonable probability that the person will not
thereafter violate the law.
2. The parole board shall give a thorough review of the case history and prison record
of any offender described in subsection 1 of this section. At the end of the parole board's
review, the parole board shall provide the offender with a copy of a statement of reasons for
its parole decision. If the parole board denies parole, the offender may reapply for board
review under this section once every two years.
3. Any offender released under the provisions of this section shall be under the
supervision of the division of probation and parole for an amount of time to be determined by
the parole board.
4. The parole board shall consider, but not be limited to the following criteria when
making its parole decision:
(1) Length of time served;
(2) Prison record and self-rehabilitation efforts;
(3) Whether the history of the case included corroborative material of physical,
sexual, [mental,] or [emotional] psychological abuse or sexual or labor trafficking of the
offender, including but not limited to witness statements, hospital records, social service
records, and law enforcement records;
(4) [If an offer of a plea bargain was made and if so, why the offender rejected or
accepted the offer;
(5)] Any victim information outlined in subsection 10 of section 217.690 and section
595.209;
[(6) The offender's continued claim of innocence;
(7)] (5) The age and maturity of the offender at the time of the parole board's
decision;
[(8)] (6) The age and maturity of the offender at the time of the crime and any
contributing influence affecting the offender's judgment;
[(9)] (7) The presence of a workable parole plan; and
[(10)] (8) Community and family support.
5. It shall not be considered a negative factor for determining parole eligibility if
an offender was unable to participate in treatment or other programming while

HCS HB 1872 3
incarcerated despite the willingness of the offender to participate in such treatment or
programming.
6. Nothing in this section shall limit the review of any offender's case who is eligible
for parole prior to [fifteen] fiveyears, nor shall it limit in any way the parole board's power to
grant parole prior to [fifteen] five years.
[6.] 7. Nothing in this section shall limit the review of any offender's case who has
applied for executive clemency, nor shall it limit in any way the governor's power to grant
clemency.
[7.] 8. It shall be the responsibility of the offender to petition the parole board for a
hearing under this section. There shall be a presumption in favor of granting a hearing on
a petition filed under this section. A hearing for an offender described in subsection 1 of
this section shall be denied only if the parole board determines that there is an inherent
lack of reliability of the facts asserted in the petition or a deficiency in the factual
allegations in the petition. If the parole board determines that the offender is not
entitled to a hearing, the board shall provide written findings of fact outlining the
reasons for such decision.
[8. A person commits the crime of perjury if he or she, with the purpose to deceive,
knowingly makes a false witness statement to the parole board. Perjury under this section
shall be a class D felony. ]
9. In cases where witness statements alleging physical, psychological, or sexual
domestic violence or sexual or labor trafficking are in conflict as to whether such violence
occurred or was continual and substantial in nature, the history of such alleged violence shall
be established by other corroborative evidence in addition to witness statements, as provided
by subsection 1 of this section. A contradictory statement of the victim shall not be deemed a
conflicting statement for purposes of this section.
557.600. Sections 557.600 to 557.608 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Survivors' Act".
557.602. As used in sections 557.600 to 557.608, the following terms mean:
(1) "Coercion", any scheme, plan, or pattern intended to cause a person to
believe that failure to perform an act would result in physical or psychological harm to
that person, or any of that person's family or household;
(2) "Domestic abuse", any act of physical harm or the threat of imminent
physical harm that is committed by an adult, emancipated minor, or minor child sixteen
years of age or older against another adult, emancipated minor, or minor child who is
currently or was previously an intimate partner or family or household member;

HCS HB 1872 4
(3) "Intimate partner", a spouse or former spouse, person with a continuing
social relationship of a romantic or intimate nature, person with a child in common, or
current or former cohabitating partner;
(4) "Physical abuse", any real or threatened physical injury or damage to the
body that is not accidental;
(5) "Posttraumatic stress disorder", the same as such term is defined in the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition (DSM-5, 2013),
and occurred as a result of the victimization of a survivor of domestic abuse;
(6) "Psychological abuse", a pattern of real or threatened mental intimidation,
threats, coercive control, economic-financial control, or humiliation that is intended to
provoke fear of harm;
(7) "Sentencing hearing", a postconviction hearing in which a defendant is
brought before the court for imposition of a sentence.
557.604. 1. During a hearing to:
(1) Sentence a person; or
(2) Accept a plea of guilty for a person

who is a survivor of domestic abuse and who has been charged with an offense, the trier
shall consider as a mitigating factor that the person has been abused physically, sexually,
or psychologically or coerced by the person's intimate partner or family or household
member, the trafficker of the person, or other individual who used the person for
financial gain. If the trier is a jury, the jury shall be instructed on the law.
2. The defendant shall provide to the court evidence including, but not limited
to:
(1) Documentary evidence corroborating that the defendant was a survivor of
domestic abuse, or subjected to physical, sexual, or psychological abuse, including
evidence to show prior misconduct toward the defendant by the defendant's intimate
partner or family or household member, the trafficker of the defendant, or a person who
used the defendant for financial gain if logically relevant to show motive, intent, absence
of mistake or accident, or otherwise establish a pattern of abuse or coercion. If the
conviction is for an offense under chapter 565, the evidence shall show that the victim of
the instant offense was the perpetrator of physical, sexual, or psychological abuse
against the defendant and was an intimate partner, a family or household member, the
trafficker of the defendant, or a person who used the defendant for financial gain, or
that the offense was coerced by the perpetrator of physical, sexual, or psychological
abuse against the defendant and the perpetrator was an intimate partner, a family or

HCS HB 1872 5
household member, the trafficker of the defendant, or a person who used the defendant
for financial gain; and
(2) At least one piece of documentary evidence that is a court record,
presentence report, social services record, hospital record, sworn statement from a
witness to the domestic abuse who is not the defendant, present sense impression of the
defendant, law enforcement record, domestic incident report, or order of protection.

Other evidence may include, but not be limited to, local jail records or records of the
department of corrections, documentation prepared at or near the time of the
commission of the offense or the prosecution thereof tending to support the claims of the
defendant, or verification of consultation with a licensed medical care provider or
mental health care provider, employee of a court acting within the scope of his or her
employment, member of the clergy, attorney, social worker, or rape crisis counselor, or
other advocate acting on behalf of an agency that assists victims of domestic abuse.
Expert testimony from a psychiatrist, psychologist, or mental health professional
showing that the defendant has been diagnosed with posttraumatic stress disorder may
also be submitted to the court as evidence.
3. If the trier finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant is a
survivor of domestic abuse, or was subjected to physical, sexual, or psychological abuse
or coercion and that such abuse or coercion was a substantial contributing factor to the
defendant's criminal liability, the trier shall depart from the applicable sentence to the
ranges provided as follows:
(1) Class A felonies shall be sentenced as class B felonies;
(2) Class B felonies shall be sentenced as class C felonies;
(3) Class C felonies shall be sentenced as class D felonies;
(4) Class D felonies shall be sentenced as class E felonies;
(5) Class E felonies shall be sentenced as class A misdemeanors.
557.606. 1. If a court has imposed a criminal judgment and sentence upon a
defendant other than for an offense that would require such defendant to register as a
sexual offender under sections 589.400 to 589.425, an attempt or conspiracy to commit
any such offense, or any offense for which the defendant has been sentenced to death
and the defendant is serving the sentence in the custody of the department of
corrections, the court shall impose a new, lesser sentence upon a determination
following a hearing in accordance with section 557.608 that:
(1) At the time of the offense for which the sentence is being served, the
defendant was a victim of domestic abuse or subjected to physical, sexual, or
psychological abuse or coercion inflicted by a member of the same family or household

HCS HB 1872 6
as the defendant, an intimate partner of the defendant, the trafficker of the defendant,
or other individual who used the defendant for financial gain; and
(2) Such abuse was a significant contributing factor to the offense for which the
defendant is presently in custody or to the criminal behavior of the defendant.
2. At the hearing to determine whether the defendant should be resentenced
under this section, the court shall consider oral and written arguments, take testimony
from witnesses offered by either party, and consider all relevant evidence to assist in
making its determination. The court may determine that such abuse constitutes a
significant contributing factor to the crime regardless of whether the defendant raised
an affirmative defense.
557.608. 1. Any person who is:
(1) Confined in an institution under the custody and control of the department of
corrections;
(2) Serving a sentence for a class A, B, C, D, or E felony for an offense committed
prior to August 28, 2026; and
(3) Eligible for an alternative sentence under the provisions of section 557.604,

may, on or after August 28, 2026, submit to the judge who imposed the original sentence
a request to apply for resentencing in accordance with the provisions of section 557.604.
Such person shall include in the request documentation showing that he or she is
confined in an institution under the custody and control of the department of
corrections and is serving a sentence for a class A, B, C, D, or E felony for an offense
committed prior to August 28, 2026. The person shall also declare that he or she is
eligible for an alternative sentence under the provisions of section 557.604.
2. At the time of the request to apply for resentencing, if the original sentencing
judge is a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction but such court is not the court in
which the original sentence was imposed, the request shall be randomly assigned to
another judge of the court in which the original sentence was imposed. If the original
sentencing judge is no longer a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction, the request
shall be randomly assigned to another judge of the appropriate court.
3. (1) If the court finds that such person has met the requirements to apply for
resentencing as provided in subsection 1 of this section, the court shall provide notice to
the person that he or she may submit an application for resentencing. Upon such
notification, the person may request that the court appoint an attorney as provided
under chapter 600 to assist the person in the preparation of and proceedings on the
application for resentencing.

HCS HB 1872 7
(2) If the court finds that such person has not met the requirements to apply for
resentencing as provided for in subsection 1 of this section, the court shall notify the
person and dismiss his or her request without prejudice.
4. Upon the receipt of an application for resentencing, the court clerk shall
promptly notify the appropriate prosecuting attorney and provide such prosecuting
attorney with a copy of the application.
5. If the judge who received the application is not the judge who originally
sentenced the applicant, the application may be referred to the original sentencing judge
provided that he or she is a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction and the applicant
and the prosecuting attorney agree that the application should be referred.
6. An application for resentencing under this section shall include evidence
corroborating the claim of the applicant that he or she was a victim of domestic abuse or
subjected to substantial physical, sexual, or psychological abuse inflicted by a member
of the same family or household as the applicant, an intimate partner who was in a
relationship with the applicant, the trafficker of the applicant, or other individual who
used the applicant for financial gain. At least one piece of evidence shall be a court
record, presentence report, social services record, hospital record, sworn statement
from a witness to the domestic abuse or coercion who is not the applicant, present sense
impression of the applicant, law enforcement record, domestic incident report, or order
of protection. Other evidence may include, but not be limited to, local jail records or
records of the department of corrections, documentation prepared at or near the time of
the commission of the offense or the prosecution thereof or documents in the possession
or control of a prosecuting office tending to support the claims of the applicant, or
verification of consultation with a licensed medical care provider or mental health care
provider, employee of a court acting within the scope of his or her employment, member
of the clergy, attorney, social worker, or rape crisis counselor, or other advocate acting
on behalf of an agency that assists victims of domestic abuse. Expert testimony from a
psychiatrist, psychologist, or mental health professional showing that the applicant has
been diagnosed with posttraumatic stress disorder may also be submitted to the court as
evidence.
7. (1) If the court finds that the applicant has not complied with the provisions
of subsection 6 of this section, the court shall dismiss the application without prejudice.
(2) If the court finds that the applicant has complied with the provisions of
subsection 6 of this section, the court shall conduct a hearing to aid in making its
determination of whether the applicant should be resentenced in accordance with
section 557.604. At the hearing, the court shall determine any controverted issues of fact
relevant to the issue of sentencing. The court may consider any facts or circumstances

HCS HB 1872 8
relevant to the imposition of a new sentence submitted by the applicant or the
prosecuting attorney and may consider the institutional record of confinement of such
person; provided, however, the institutional record shall not be solely dispositive as to
whether an applicant receives a reduced sentence. The court shall not order a new
presentence investigation and report or entertain any matter challenging the underlying
basis of the subject conviction. Consideration of the institutional record of confinement
of an applicant by the court shall include, but not be limited to, the participation or
willingness of the applicant to participate in programming such as domestic abuse,
parenting, and substance abuse treatment while incarcerated and the disciplinary
history of the applicant. The fact that the applicant may have been unable to participate
in treatment or other programming while incarcerated despite the willingness of the
applicant to do so shall not be considered a negative factor when the court is making its
determination.
8. If the court determines that the applicant should not be resentenced in
accordance with section 557.604, the court shall inform such applicant of its decision
and shall enter an order to that effect. Any order issued by a court under this
subsection shall include written findings of fact and the reasons for such order.
9. If the court determines that the applicant should be resentenced in accordance
with section 557.604, the court shall notify the applicant that, unless he or she withdraws
the application for resentencing or appeals the order of the court, the court shall enter
an order vacating the sentence originally imposed and shall impose a new, lesser
sentence, upon a determination following a hearing, as authorized by section 557.604.
Any order issued by a court under this section shall include written findings of fact and
the reasons for such order. Sentences modified under the provisions of this section shall
be reduced in the following manner:
(1) Sentences for class A felonies shall be resentenced as class B felonies;
(2) Sentences for class B felonies shall be resentenced as class C felonies;
(3) Sentences for class C felonies shall be resentenced as class D felonies;
(4) Sentences for class D felonies shall be resentenced as class E felonies;
(5) Sentences for class E felonies shall be resentenced within the class A
misdemeanor range.
10. An appeal to the court of appeals may be taken as of right in accordance with
the applicable provisions provided for by law from:
(1) An order denying resentencing; or
(2) A new sentence imposed under the provisions of this section.


HCS HB 1872 9
100 The applicant may request that the court of appeals appoint an attorney as provided
101 under chapter 600 to the applicant for the preparation of and proceedings for any
102 appeal regarding the application for resentencing.
103 11. When calculating the new sentence to be served by the applicant under
104 section 557.604, such applicant shall be credited for any time served in the county jail
105 and any period of incarceration served under the custody and control of the department
106 of corrections toward the sentence originally imposed.
Section B. The enactment of sections 557.600 to 557.608 of this act shall become
effective on November 1, 2026.
✔